Maine, session 132, LD1668.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 3 MRSA §2, 2nd ¶, as amended by PL 2019, c. 475, §11, is further amended
to read:
The first regular session of the Legislature, after its convening, shall may not adjourn
no later than the 3rd Wednesday in June and the 2nd regular session of the Legislature shall
may not adjourn no later than the 3rd Wednesday in April. The Legislature, in case of
emergency, may by a the affirmative vote of 2/3 a majority of the members of each House
present and voting, extend the date for adjournment for the first or 2nd regular session by
no more than 5 legislative days, and in case of further emergency, may by a the affirmative
vote of 2/3 a majority of the members of each House present and voting, further extend the
date for adjournment by 5 additional legislative days. The times for adjournment for the
first and 2nd regular sessions may also be extended for one additional legislative day for
the purpose of considering possible objections of the Governor to any bill or resolution
presented to the Governor by the Legislature under the Constitution of Maine, Article IV,
Part Third, Section 2.
Page 1 - 132LR1486(03)